Donald Trump|Speech: Donald Trump in Tampa, FL|June 6, 2016
[This was transcribed and punctuated by Factba.se's AI, Margaret, and automatically corrected based on her understanding of Donald Trump's speech patterns. It has not been edited by a human. Please double-check any quotes against the video.]
Right, unbelievable, right, unbelievable, right, unbelievable. Well, I want to start by thinking you well, I want to start by thinking you well, I want to start by thinking, you know, Rick, he's done an amazing job as know Rick. He's done an amazing job as know Rick. He's done an amazing job as your governor.
He's done an amazing job. Your governor, he's done an amazing job. Your governor, he's done an amazing job and he's a great guy and I want to thank and he's a great guy and I want to thank and he's a great guy and I want to thank Rick and I want to thank Pam. She has Rick and I want to thank Pam, she has Rick and I want to thank Pam.
She has been an incredible source of inspiration, been an incredible source of inspiration, been an incredible source of inspiration for everybody in this room. So I want to - for everybody in this room, so I want to for everybody in this room. So I want to thank Pam and Rick and everybody else thank Pam and Rick and everybody else thank Pam and Rick and everybody else that's been here and the support that that's been here and the support that that's been here and the support that we've had in Florida has been incredible, we've had in Florida has been incredible.
We've had in Florida has been incredible, very important to stay. Number one, I'm very important to stay number one, I'm very important to stay number one, I'm here. I'm always here. You know, I have a here. I'm always here, you know, I have a here, I'm always here, you know I have a lot of places in Florida.
We have a lot, lot of places in Florida. We have a lot, lot of places in Florida. We have a lot of employees. We pay a lot of money out of employees, we pay a lot of money out of employees. We pay a lot of money out to the employees. They have great health to the employees. They have great health to the employees.
They have great health care. They have great education for their care, they have great education for their care. They have great education for their families and I'm very happy. So I love families and I'm very happy. So I love families and I'm very happy. So I love being with you this morning. Very special being with you this morning, very special being with you this morning, very special.
Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. You know it's a a little bit different, you know, it's a - a little bit different. You know it's a - a little bit different world. I'm just watching the television world. I'm just watching the television world. I'm just watching the television, the news and in France they have all the news.
And in France they have all the news. And in France, they have all sorts of problems. They have this massive sorts of problems. They have this massive sorts of problems. They have this massive soccer tournament, they don't know soccer tournament, they don't know soccer tournament, they don't know whether or not they can even hold it.
Whether or not they can even hold it, whether or not they can even hold it. They're absolutely petrified about. They're absolutely petrified about - they're absolutely petrified about radical Islamic terrorism coming up and radical Islamic terrorism coming up and radical, Islamic terrorism coming up. And - and they don't know what to do should we - and they don't know what to do should we - and they don't know what to do, should we hold it?
Should we not hold it, the police hold it? Should we not hold it the police hold it? Should we not hold it, the police are afraid we got to get tough folks, we are afraid we got to get tough folks. We are afraid we got to get tough folks. We got to get tough, we got to get smart, we got to get tough, we got to get smart, we got to get tough, we got to get smart, we got to be vigilant, we got to take care, got to be vigilant, we got to take care, Got to be vigilant, we got to take care of people, we don't want division, but we of people we don't want division, but we of people we don't want division, but we - we've got to be smart.
I mean, you can't - we've got to be smart. I mean you can't - we've got to be smart. I mean you can't have this happening. This is all over the - have this happening. This is all over the - have this happening. This is all over the world right now in our country right now. World right now in our country right now, world right now in our country right now, we're allowing thousands of people.
We're allowing thousands of people. We're allowing thousands of people, thousands upon thousands of people to thousands upon thousands of people to thousands upon thousands of people to come into our country. And we have no come into our country and we have no come into our country. And we have no idea who the hell, they are idea who the hell, they are idea who the hell they are.
We have no idea they're coming in from - we have no idea they're coming in from - we have no idea they're coming in from the migration and you look at the - the migration and you look at the - the migration and you look at the migration and I look At the migration migration and I look at the migration migration and I look at the migration and I say how come there's so many young and I say how come there's so many young and I say how come there's so many young strong men, why don't they Have so many strong men, why don't they have so many strong men, why don't they have so many women?
Why don't they have so many women? Why don't they have so many women? Why don't they have so many children? And I look and I say what's children and I look and I say what's children and I look and I say what's going on, what's going on and we're going on what's going on and we're going on what's going on and we're allowing people to come in.
There's no allowing people to come in. There's no allowing people to come in. There's no documentation. There's no paperwork. We documentation. There's no paperwork. We documentation. There's no paperwork. We don't know who they are, where they come. Don't know who they are, where they come. Don't know who they are, where they come from.
We don't know. Is it Syria? Is it from - we don't know, is it Syria, is it from - we don't know, is it Syria? Is it something else, something else, something else? Is it Isis? Maybe you know the story of is it Isis, maybe you know the story of, is it Isis, maybe you know the story of the Trojan horse. This could be the - the Trojan horse, this could be the - the Trojan horse.
This could be the ultimate Trojan horse folks. These are ultimate Trojan horse folks. These are ultimate Trojan horse folks. These are smart people. They know what they're smart people, they know what they're smart people, they know what they're doing. We have no leadership. We have a doing - we have no leadership.
We have a doing. We have no leadership. We have a president that as far as I'm concerned, president, that as far as I'm concerned, president, that as far as I'm concerned, he's incompetent and now he's going to be campaigning for and now he's going to be campaigning for and now he's going to be campaigning For crooked, Hillary Clinton, okay, he's going crooked, Hillary Clinton, okay?
He's going crooked, Hillary Clinton, okay? He's going to be campaign. So I look at what's going on. I see. So I look at what's going on. I see - so I look at what's going on. I see what's happening and I've had a lot of what's happening and I've had a lot of what's happening and I've had a lot of vision.
I've had some pretty good vision vision. I've had some pretty good vision vision. I've had some pretty good vision. I said don't go into Iraq, you're going - I said don't go into Iraq. You're going - I said, don't go into Iraq. You're going to destabilize the Middle East. They went to destabilize the Middle East.
They went to destabilize the Middle East. They went into Iraq. And I said it right from the - into Iraq and I said it right from the - into Iraq and I said it right from the beginning, remember that they said well, beginning remember that they said well, beginning remember that they said well maybe in nineteen, whatever.
Let me tell maybe in nineteen, whatever, let me tell maybe in nineteen, whatever, let me tell you, I was early and I was really - I was you - I was early and I was really - I was you, I was early and I was really - I was from the Beginning because it was going from the beginning because it was going from the beginning because it was going to destabilize the Middle East and then to destabilize the Middle East and then to destabilize the Middle East.
And then they say old Donald Trump is very tough. They say old Donald Trump is very tough. They say old Donald Trump is very tough. He's got a tough temperament. He's got a - he's got a tough temperament, he's got a - he's got a tough temperament, he's got a tough town. We need a tough town now, tough town.
We need a tough town, now, tough town. We need a tough town. Now folks we need a tough town. We need it folks. We need a tough town. We need it folks. We need a tough town. We need it. We've got a bunch of lightweights, you - we've got a bunch of lightweights, you - we've got a bunch of lightweights, you know, Hillary Clinton was saying the know Hillary Clinton was saying the know Hillary Clinton was saying the other day temperament.
That's her whole other day temperament. That's her whole other day temperament, that's her whole thing temperament. You know, number one, I thing temperament, you know, number one I thing temperament, you know number one, I built an unbelievable company, a great built an unbelievable company, a great built, an unbelievable company, a great company.
I filed papers with federal company, I filed papers with federal company, I filed papers with federal election, you know build companies like election, you know build companies like election. You know, build companies like that unless you have the right that unless you have the right that unless you have the right temperament, believe me, but Hillary temperament, believe me, but Hillary temperament, believe me, but Hillary Clinton, they just came out with a book a Clinton.
They just came out with a book a Clinton, they just came out with a book, a Secret Service agent was with her for a Secret Service agent was with her for a Secret Service agent was with her for a long time said she's a total mess, a Mess long time said she's a total mess, a mess. Long time said she's a total mess, a mess.
She's not qualified to be president you. She's not qualified to be president you. She's not qualified to be president. You know who said that. Bernie Sanders said know who said that Bernie Sanders said know who said that Bernie Sanders said that Hillary Clinton is not qualified to that. Hillary Clinton is not qualified to that.
Hillary Clinton is not qualified to be president. And he said it because she be president and he said it because she be president and he said it because she has bad judgment and she does have bad, has bad judgment and she does have bad, has bad judgment. And she does have bad judgment. Look at the message, he's got us judgment, look at the message, he's got us judgment look at the message.
He's got us into with Syria, everything she touches into with Syria, everything she touches into with Syria, everything she touches and you're gonna have four more years of - and you're gonna have four more years of - and you're gonna have four more years of that. We won't have a country left folks that we won't have a country left folks that we won't have a country left.
Folks believe me, we will not have a country. Believe me, we will not have a country. Believe me, we will not have a country left, not to mention the Supreme Court left, not to mention the Supreme Court left, not to mention the Supreme Court. You got to remember the Supreme Court, you got to remember the Supreme Court, you got to remember the Supreme Court.
Hello. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Thank you. Is there anyplace better than a trump? Is there anyplace better than a trump? Is there anyplace better than a trump rally for any place coming right even on rally for any place coming right even on rally for any place coming, right?
Even on a Saturday morning, a Saturday morning, a Saturday morning look at these crowds. I mean we have look at these crowds. I mean we have look at these crowds. I mean we have crabs, crabs, crabs, you know folks, I'll tell you what. Look, you know, folks, I'll tell you what. Look, you know, folks, I'll tell you what.
Look, here's a Saturday morning in Tampa. We - here's a Saturday morning in Tampa. We - here's a Saturday morning in Tampa. We could be doing other things right. There could be doing other things right, there could be doing other things right. There are other things to be doing and you are other things to be doing and you are other things to be doing.
And you look at the crowd by the way, I was just look at the crowd by the way, I was just look at the crowd by the way, I was just informed we're two points up in Florida informed we're two points up in Florida informed we're two Points up in Florida and we haven't even started yet, okay? We - and we haven't even started yet, okay?
We - and we haven't even started yet, okay, we have it. And after this, I'm going to have it. And after this, I'm going to have it. And after this, I'm going to Pittsburgh, we'll be in Pittsburgh, this Pittsburgh, we'll be in Pittsburgh, this Pittsburgh. We'll be in Pittsburgh this afternoon and we're going to do great in afternoon and we're going to do great in afternoon and we're going to do great in Pennsylvania.
You know, the interesting Pennsylvania, you know, the interesting Pennsylvania, you know, the interesting thing is a lot of these states were not thing is a lot of these states were not thing is a lot of these states were not really states where the Republican was really states Where the Republican was really states where the Republican was supposed to do well and your traditional supposed to do well and your traditional supposed to do well and your traditional, I guess I'm not traditional, you know, one, I guess I'm not traditional, you know, one, I guess I'm not traditional, you know, one of the reasons I'm not remember, Jeb Bush of the reasons, I'm not remember, Jeb Bush of the reasons - I'm not remember, Jeb Bush, he used to say you just got to a - he used to say you just got to a - he Used to say you just got to a conservative, he is not a conservative, I conservative, he is not a conservative, I conservative.
He is not a conservative, I am actually conservative, but you know am actually conservative, but you know am actually conservative. But you know what, you know what I am - I'm for what, what you know what I am - I'm for what, what you know what I am - I'm for what works like on trade. They said they said works like on trade.
They said they said works like on trade, they said they said on trade they say we want free trade. So on trade they say we want free trade. So on trade, they say we want free trade, so do I, but to have free trade you need do I but to have free trade you need do I but to have free trade, you need smart leaders.
We don't have smart smart leaders. We don't have smart, smart leaders, we don't have smart leaders. We have dumb leaders, okay? So we leaders, we have dumb leaders, okay? So we leaders, we have dumb leaders, okay? So we have to do so. Here's the story on trade have to do so. Here's the story on trade have to do so here's the story on trade.
They said, do you like free trade? I said they said, do you like free trade? I said they said, do you like free trade? I said yes. Well, what's your policy on trade? You? Yes, well, what's your policy on trade you - yes, well what's your policy on trade? You know what I said, I want to make good know what I said.
I want to make good know what I said. I want to make good deals for the United States. That's my deals for the United States, that's my deals for the United States. That's my policy or it's very simple. I don't care policy or it's very simple. I don't care policy or it's very simple. I don't care if it's free.
I don't care if it's - if it's free, I don't care if it's - if it's free, I don't care if it's totally unfree. I want to make good deals totally unfree. I want to make good deals totally unfree. I want to make good deals for the United States because the United for the United States, because the United for the United States, because the United States is getting ripped off by every States, is getting ripped off by every States, is getting ripped off by every single Country virtually in the world, single country, virtually in the world, single country, virtually in the world, every country is taking our money and every country is taking our money and every country is taking our money and taking our jobs.
And we have people that taking our jobs and we have people that taking our jobs and we have people that are political hacks, negotiating the - are political hacks, negotiating the - are political hacks, negotiating the biggest deals in the world. And they biggest deals in the world. And they biggest deals in the world and they don't know what the hell they're doing.
Don't know what the hell they're doing, don't know what the hell they're doing. And we have the greatest business people and we have the greatest business people and we have the greatest business people in the world, many of whom have endorsed in the world, many of whom have endorsed in the world, many of whom have endorsed me, Carl Icahn.
All these guys, they're all me, Carl Icahn, all these guys, they're all me, Carl Icahn, all these guys, they're all endorsing me and they don't want to get endorsing me and they don't want to get endorsing me and they don't want to get paid money for them. It's a game of poker, paid money for them. It's a game of poker, paid money for them.
It's a game of poker. It's a game of chess they want to go. It's a game of chess. They want to go. It's a game of chess. They want to go against China. They've done great against against China. They've done great against against China. They've done great against China. I've done great against China and China.
I've done great against China and China. I've done great against China. And I do really what I like the Chinese, I do really what I like the Chinese, I do really what I like the Chinese people, I love the Mexican people. I have people, I love the Mexican people. I have people, I love the Mexican people I have.
So many Mexicans working for me, I love so many Mexicans working for me, I love so many Mexicans working for me. I love all these countries. I don't hold all these countries. I don't hold all these countries. I don't hold anything against people. I hold it anything against people. I hold it anything against people.
I hold it against our leaders for being so totally against our leaders for being so totally against our leaders for being so totally grossly incompetent because they don't grossly incompetent because they don't grossly incompetent because they don't know what they're doing. And you look at know what they're doing and you look at know what they're doing and you look at these trade deals and you look where these trade deals and you look where these trade deals and you look where China as an example, Hey, look the biggest China as an example, Hey, look the biggest China as an example, Hey, look, the biggest bank in the world is a tenant of mine in bank in the world is a tenant of mine in bank in the world is a tenant of mine in a building in Manhattan from China I a building in Manhattan from China, I a building in Manhattan from China, I sell condos to people from China for a sell condos to people from China for a sell condos to people from China for a tremendous amount of money, tens of tremendous Amount of money, tens of tremendous amount of money, tens of millions of dollars.
I love these people millions of dollars. I love these people millions of dollars. I love these people. I love these people. I love these people. I love these people. I own the big chunk of the Bank of I own, the big chunk of the Bank of I own. The big chunk of the Bank of America building in San Francisco comes America building in San Francisco, comes America building in San Francisco, comes through China through an indirect Wow through China through an indirect Wow through China through an indirect Wow, you're very complicated.
But through - you're very complicated, but through - you're very complicated, but through China we can do great with China and by China we can do great with China and by China we can do great with China. And by the way, China is ripping us off. So is the way China is ripping us off. So is the way China is ripping us off.
So is every other country. China is ripping us every other country. China is ripping us every other country. China is ripping us off. They're the number one abuser off. They're the number one abuser off. They're the number one abuser because what they do is they devalue because what they do is they devalue because what they do is they devalue their currency.
Do you ever notice their currency? Do you ever notice their currency? Do you ever notice whenever they have a little problem, we whenever they have a little problem, we whenever they have a little problem, we start to cut in. They devalue their start to cut in, they devalue their start to cut in, they devalue their currency, knock our companies out of currency, knock our companies out of currency, knock our companies out of business, they knock us out of business business.
They knock us out of business business. They knock us out of business. And again, I'm not angry at China. I'm - and again, I'm not angry at China. I'm - and again, I'm not angry at China. I'm angry at our leaders, if you call them angry at our leaders. If you call them angry at our leaders, if you call them that our leaders, I'm not angry at China, that our leaders - I'm not angry at China, that our leaders - I'm not angry at China.
I'm not angry at anybody. I'm angry at. I'm not angry at anybody. I'm angry at - I'm not angry at anybody, I'm angry at our leaders because they don't know what our leaders, because they don't know what our leaders, because they don't know what they're doing. They don't know. And we're - they're doing - they don't know.
And we're - they're doing - they don't know and we're not gonna have a country, I'll tell you, not gonna have a country, I'll tell you, not gonna have a country, I'll tell you what, I didn't need to do this folks you - what I didn't need To do this folks you what I didn't need to do this folks, you know, in all fairness, I didn't need to do know in all fairness.
I didn't need to do know in all fairness. I didn't need to do this. This is something I want to give this. This is something I want to give this. This is something I want to give back. You know, you ever hear the back. You know, you ever hear the back. You know, you ever hear the expression people want to give back, I've expression people want to give back.
I've expression people want to give back. I've done so well in this country. It's been done so well in this country. It's been done so well in this country. It's been such a great country. I love the people such a great country. I love the people such a great country. I love the people of the country now more than ever before of the country now more than ever before of the country.
Now more than ever before, you know we have a movement going on, you know, we have a movement going on. You know we have a movement going on folks. I mean, look at this room, this folks, I mean look at this room, this folks, I mean look at this room, this massive room at this time time. Is it massive room at this time time, is it massive room at this time time, is it?
Yeah, I mean it's like in the morning. Yeah, I mean, it's like in the morning, yeah, I mean it's like in the morning look at this room and it's like this. No look at this room and it's like this. No look at this room and it's like this no matter where we go. We give one day's matter where we go, we give one day's matter where we go.
We give one day's notice yesterday. We gave one day's notice yesterday. We gave one day's notice yesterday. We gave one day's notice in, we were in Virginia, one day's notice in. We were in Virginia, one day's notice in - we were in Virginia, one day's known as the place. I mean we have known as the place.
I mean we have known as the place. I mean we have thousands and thousands of people and thousands and thousands of people. And thousands and thousands of people and it's called listen to this, it's called a - it's called listen to this, it's called a - it's called listen to this, it's called a movement.
We are part of a movement. And you know in many, many years I was on the, you know, in many, many years I was on the, you know, in many, many years I was on the cover of Time magazine all these years. I cover of Time magazine all these years. I cover of Time magazine all these years I work and work. I was on the cover of Time work and work.
I was on the cover of Time work and work. I was on the cover of Time magazine I think once or twice right for magazine. I think once or twice right for magazine, I think once or twice, right, for years, years, 35 years, that's not so bad years, years, 35 years, that's not so bad years, years, 35 years, that's not so bad once or twice cover of time.
Now the last once or twice cover of time now, the last once or twice cover of time. Now the last six months, I think I'm four or five, six months, I think I'm four or five, six months, I think I'm four or five times is it crazy. So chose you know it times is it crazy, so chose you know it times is it crazy.
So chose you know, it shows you how important it is. It's like shows you how important it is. It's like shows you how important it is. It's like the other day I woke up. I look, I say the other day I woke up, I look, I say the other day I woke up, I look, I say what's that, it's the cover of Time, what's that?
It's the cover of Time, what's that? It's the cover of Time magazine, it's my picture. I didn't even magazine, it's my picture. I didn't even magazine. It's my picture. I didn't even know I was going to be in the cover know I was going to be in the cover know I was going to be in the cover because you know what happens.
We have because you know what happens we have because you know what happens. We have something going that's so special that's something going that's so special that's something going that's so special that's so big that so important pundits are so big that so important pundits are so big that so important pundits are saying many of them.
It's the single saying many of them, it's the single saying many of them. It's the single greatest political movement that they've greatest political movement that they've greatest political movement that they've seen ever in this country ever in this seen ever in this country ever in this seen ever in this country, ever in this country.
And and we're gonna win the race you and - and we're gonna win the race you and - and we're gonna win the race. You know, one thing they was talking about know one thing they was talking about know one thing they was talking about before a number of states, I don't know before a number of states. I don't know before a number of states.
I don't know if you saw with New Yorker, I won in a - if you saw with New Yorker, I won in a - if you saw with New Yorker, I won in a massive landslide. We won Pennsylvania in massive landslide. We won Pennsylvania in massive landslide. We won Pennsylvania in the primaries, in a massive landslide, the primaries in a massive landslide, the primaries in a massive landslide, they're all landslides.
Connecticut was - they're all landslides. Connecticut was - they're all landslides. Connecticut was so great. We won that in a massive, so great. We won that in a massive, so great. We won that in a massive landslide. They even used the word they - landslide, they even used the word they - landslide, they even used the word.
They hate to use it with me if it was Bernie, hate to use it with me if it was Bernie, hate to use it with me. If it was Bernie Sanders who said it was a massive Sanders who said it was a massive Sanders who said it was a massive landslide, not so long ago, I had 17,000 landslide not so long ago, I had 17,000 landslide not so long ago, I had 17,000 People at an event, people at an event, people at an event, Bernie, at a different location, had 3,000, Bernie at a different location, had 3,000, Bernie at a different location, had 3,000 people, which is a lot of people, 3,000 people, which is a lot of people, 3,000 People, which is a lot of people, 3,000 people, but I had this massive crowd, I people, but I had this massive crowd, I people, but I had this massive crowd I think was 17,000 and they said Donald think was 17,000 and they said Donald think was 17,000. And they said Donald Trump is here tonight and he's Trump is here tonight and he's Trump is here tonight and he's discussing what he's discussing.
You know, discussing what he's discussing, you know, discussing what he's discussing, you know, let's all fall asleep when they go, huh? Let's all fall asleep when they go, huh? Let's all fall asleep when they go, huh? And he goes - Donald Trump talked about and he goes - Donald Trump talked about and he goes.
Donald Trump talked about this and then, okay, back to you in New this. And then, okay, back to you in New this and then, okay, back to you in New York and then the guy from Bernie said York and then the guy from Bernie said York and then the guy from Bernie said, Bernie Sanders is here tonight. He's got - Bernie Sanders is here tonight.
He's got Bernie Sanders is here tonight. He's got a massive crowd of 3,000 people and I'm a massive crowd of 3,000 people. And I'm a massive crowd of 3,000 people. And I'm saying, I don't believe it. I have 17,000 saying, I don't believe it, I have 17,000 saying, I don't believe it. I have 17,000 people, they don't say it.
And by the way, people - they don't say it. And by the way, people - they don't say it. And by the way, the cameras, they never scanned the room, the cameras, they never scanned the room, the cameras, they never scanned the room every time now. It's true. They never every time now it's true. They never every time now it's true.
They never scanned them scanned them scanned them very dishonest people. They're very, very dishonest people. They're very, very dishonest people. They're very dishonest people, but they never the only dishonest people, but they never the only dishonest people, but they never - the only time they scan the room is if there's a time they scan the room is if there's a time they scan the room is if there's A protester because that's the bad thing protester because that's the bad thing protester because that's the bad thing they think.
But I love my protesters we they think, but I love my protesters we they think, but I love my protesters. We love our protesters right, love our protesters, right, love our protesters, right. We love we're going to get many of those. We love, we're going to get many of those. We love we're going to get many of those protesters are going to end up work protesters are going to end up work protesters are going to end up work.
Believe me, a lot of the protesters that believe me a lot of the protesters that believe me a lot of the protesters that you see they're going to end up voting. You see they're going to end up voting. You see they're going to end up voting for Trump. Believe me, when they learn how for Trump, believe me, when they learn how for Trump, believe me, when they learn how crooked crooked Hillary is they get into crooked, crooked.
Hillary is they get into crooked, crooked. Hillary is - they get into voting for Trump and a lot of Bernie voting for Trump and a lot of Bernie voting for Trump and a lot of Bernie Sanders people, you know he got - he got a Sanders people, you know he got - he got a Sanders people. You know he got - he got a rigged system now.
I used to say the rigged system. Now I used to say the rigged system, now I used to say the Republican system was rigged, but it is Republican system was rigged, but it is Republican system was rigged. But it is - it's impossible, it's almost impossible, it's impossible, it's almost impossible, it's impossible.
It's almost impossible for a guy like me. You know, I was for a guy like me, you know, I was for a guy like me, you know, I was establishment, I shouldn't say it establishment, I shouldn't say it establishment. I shouldn't say it. Everyone's gonna leave if I say that, but everyone's gonna leave if I say that, but everyone's gonna leave if I say that, but that's okay.
I was like the ultimate, that's okay. I was like the ultimate, that's okay. I was like the ultimate establishment guy campaign, contributions, establishment guy campaign contributions, establishment guy campaign contributions. I was a very popular, they called me, hi. I was a very popular, they called me, hi.
I was a very popular, they called me hi. Mr. Trump, we're having a golf outing, I'd - mr. Trump, we're having a golf outing. I'd - mr. Trump, we're having a golf outing. I'd always say no, thanks, but I don't was always say no. Thanks, but I don't was always say no. Thanks. But I don't was send the check, but I was like an send the check, but I was like an send the check, but I was like an establishment person and then once I establishment person and then once I establishment person and then once I said I'm running, They said what the hell said I'm running, they said what the hell said I'm running, they said what the hell is running and all of a sudden he became is running and all of a sudden he became is running and all of a sudden he became the Outsider of all outsiders and I'm the outsider of all outsiders and I'm the outsider of all outsiders and I'm running because I understand how the running, because I understand how the running, because I understand how the system works better than anybody.
So I've system works better than anybody, so I've system works better than anybody. So I've been doing this now for 12 months. Have I been doing this now for 12 months? Have I been doing this now for 12 months? Have I done a good job? Have I done a good job, but I've been doing it for 12 months and - but I've been doing it for 12 months and - but I've been doing it for 12 months and it's been, you know, it's been - thank you.
It's been, you know, it's been - thank you. It's been, you know, it's been - thank you honey. She said, thank you. Believe me, it's honey. She said thank you. Believe me, it's honey. She said thank you. Believe me, it's not easy. Folks. You think this stuff is not easy, folks, you think this stuff is not easy, folks, you think this stuff is easy, it's not easy, but - but thank you but easy.
It's not easy, but - but thank you but easy. It's not easy but - but thank you. But you know what, I love doing it a friend, you know what, I love doing it a friend, you know what I love doing it a friend of mine and I've told the story but a of mine and I've told the story but a of mine and I've told the story, but a friend of mine likes to come to these friend of mine likes to come to these friend of mine likes to come to these things.
A lot of people like to come things. A lot of people like to come things a lot of people like to come who's been to these events more than. Who's been to these events more than who's been to these events more than once telling you, I'm telling you a great once telling you, I'm telling you a great once telling you.
I'm telling you a great, great musician. Said Trump is the best in great musician said Trump is the best in great musician. Said Trump is the best in the world and he doesn't have a guitar the world and he doesn't have a guitar the world and he doesn't have a guitar, meaning we get the biggest crowds and I meaning we get the biggest crowds.
And I meaning we get the biggest crowds and I don't play a guitar who else does this, don't play a guitar who else does this don't play a guitar who else does this without a band or without a musical without a band or without a musical without A band or without a musical instrument, believe me, it's a lot easier instrument.
Believe me, it's a lot easier instrument. Believe me, it's a lot easier with an instrument. But - but look, look we with an instrument but - but look, look we with an instrument but - but look, look, we have something happening that's so have something happening that's so have something happening that's so important.
And in November, we have to do important and in November, we have to do important. And in November, we have to do such a good job. Now it's early. We're such a good job. Now it's early. We're such a good job. Now it's early. We're just starting the process. Most people just starting the process, most people just starting the process, most people say don't even bother campaigning, right, say don't even bother campaigning, right, say don't even bother campaigning right now.
It's June, wait till after the - now it's June, wait till after the - now it's June, wait till after the convention. We're gonna have a great convention. We're gonna have a great convention. We're gonna have a great convention wait till after the convention wait till after the convention wait till after the convention don't bother.
I don't want to convention, don't bother, I don't want to convention, don't bother. I don't want to do that. I'm sitting home, I'm listening, do that. I'm sitting home, I'm listening do that. I'm sitting home. I'm listening to lies being told about me by this to lies being told about me by this to lies being told about me by this dishonest media, because believe me, they dishonest media because believe me, they dishonest media because believe me they are so dishonest, you know.
So dishonest are so dishonest, you know, so dishonest are so dishonest you know, so dishonest, man, I watched this poor sad Mitt Romney this, I watched this poor sad Mitt Romney this. I watched this poor sad Mitt Romney this morning, morning morning. He suffers from misogynist. I don't think he suffers from misogynist.
I don't think he suffers from misogynist. I don't think he knows what misogynist is. He suffers. He knows what misogynist is, he suffers. He knows what misogynist is he suffers from and he's sitting like a real stiff from and he's sitting like a real stiff from and he's sitting like a real stiff. Don't forget this guy.
Let us down folks. Don't forget this guy. Let us down folks. Don't forget this guy let us down folks, he choked and he let us down and we're - he choked and he let us down and we're - he choked and he let us down and we're not gonna let it and he knows that, hey, not gonna let It - and he knows that, hey, not gonna let it and he knows that, hey, look, he doesn't like Trump because I look - he doesn't like Trump because I look, he doesn't like Trump because I said you can't give him a third chance said you can't give Him a third chance said you can't give him a third chance.
He lost the first time. He really lost. He lost the first time he really lost. He lost the first time. He really lost the second time and the second time was the second time. And the second time was the second time and the second time was a race that was an easy one, a race that was an easy one, a race that was an easy one.
We had a failed president. We had a - we had a failed president. We had a - we had a failed president, we had a president who's a disaster and was a president who's a disaster and was a president who's a disaster and was a disaster. And at that point, he was even disaster. And at that point, he was even disaster.
And at that point, he was even lower than he is now. So he had a failed lower than he is now. So he had a failed lower than he is now. So he had a failed president and we had a candidate that president and we had a candidate that president and we had a candidate that didn't work like he should have worked, didn't work like he should have worked, didn't work like he should have worked.
He wasn't doing television, you know I - he wasn't doing television, you know I - he wasn't doing television, you know, I called up called up called up, I'd say cuz. I supported him. I gave him a, I'd say cuz, I supported him. I gave him a, I'd say cuz, I supported him, I gave him a tremendous amount of money.
I did robo tremendous amount of money. I did robo tremendous amount of money. I did robo calls. I did a couple of speeches for him calls. I did a couple of speeches for him calls. I did a couple of speeches for him. Frankly, if they would have used me in frankly if they would have used me in frankly if they would have used me in Florida, he would have won Florida, but Florida, he would have won Florida, but Florida he would have won Florida, but they're not smart enough.
They would have - they're not smart enough, they would have - they're not smart enough, they would have won Florida. But you know what I work for won Florida, but you know what I work for won Florida, but you know what I work for him. But then when I heard he was gonna him, but then when I heard he was gonna him, but then when I heard he was gonna run again and I was thinking about run again and I was thinking about run again and I was thinking About running, I let him know.
I said the guy's running, I let him know. I said the guy's running. I let him know. I said the guy's a stone-cold loser. He choked and when a stone-cold loser, he choked and when a stone-cold loser, he choked. And when you're a joker, you can never give a - you're a joker, you can never give a - you're a joker, you can never give a joker.
A second chance it's too important. Joker, a second chance it's too important. Joker. A second chance it's too important. A joker is a joker, you see it in sports. A joker is a joker, you see it in sports. A joker is a joker, you see it in sports, you see it in sports folks. When the guy you see it in sports folks, when the guy you see it in sports folks, when the guy misses the kick you get rid of him, you misses the kick you get rid of him, you misses the kick you get rid of him.
You get another one in there, they missed the get another one in there. They missed the get another one in there. They missed the big shot. You get him out of there folks, big shot, you get him out of there, folks, big shot, you get him out of there. Folks, I don't know. That's the way I feel we - I don't know.
That's the way I feel we - I don't know. That's the way I feel we couldn't take a chance, you know, so I couldn't take a chance. You know, so I couldn't take a chance. You know, so I backed John McCain and he lost and his backed. John McCain and he lost and his backed. John McCain and he lost and his was a tough situation because frankly was a tough situation because frankly was a tough situation because frankly, I'm not sure Abraham Lincoln could have - I'm not sure Abraham Lincoln could have - I'm not sure Abraham Lincoln could have won that speech With what was going on won that speech with what was going on won that speech with what was going on.
But I backed John McCain and he lost, but I backed John McCain and he lost. But I backed John McCain and he lost I backed Mitt Romney and he really lost I backed Mitt Romney and he really lost I backed Mitt Romney and he really lost. And then I said you know what folks this and then I said you know what folks this and then I said you know what folks this time we're going to do it ourselves time.
We're going to do it ourselves time, we're going to do it ourselves. We're gonna win, we're gonna, we're gonna win, we're gonna, we're gonna win, we're gonna, no more games, no more games, no more, no, no more games, no more games, no more, no, no more games, no more games, no more, no more. Sitting there saying, I think he's a more sitting there saying I think he's a more sitting there saying I think he's a racist, I am the least racist person that racist I am the least racist person that racist I am the least racist person that you've ever Met believe me, the least, you've ever met, believe me the least, you've ever met, believe me the least racist person, I get a call yesterday as racist person.
I get a call yesterday as racist person. I get a call yesterday as an example, street smart guy, smart guy, an example street smart guy, smart guy, an example street smart guy, smart guy, but very street smart, Don King you know, but very street smart, Don King you know, but very street smart. Don King, you know Don King, the boxing promoter and Don Don King, the boxing promoter and Don Don King, the boxing promoter and Don King said Donald.
I'm endorsing you for King said Donald. I'm endorsing you for King said Donald. I'm endorsing you for president now. Do you think Don King and president now do you think Don King and president now do you think Don King and he knows me well, you think he's going to - he knows me well, you think he's going to - he knows me well, you think he's going to Endorse a racist, okay, so you know it's a endorse, a racist, okay.
So you know it's a endorse, a racist, okay. So you know it's a sad situation when people - but you know sad situation when people - but you know sad situation when people - but you know we're gonna win, but if it ever happened we're gonna win. But if it ever happened we're gonna win. But if it ever happened, where I did, I go off into the sunset, where I did, I go off into the sunset, where I did, I go off into the sunset folks.
Good luck in for you as you go off folks. Good luck in for you. As you go off folks, good luck in for you. As you go off into the sunset, you don't sit there into the sunset, you don't sit there into the sunset, you don't sit there jealous and sick to your stomach, you go jealous and sick to your stomach.
You go jealous and sick to your stomach, you go off. We have a war to win against a very off. We have a war to win against a very off. We have a war to win against a very crooked politician named Hillary Clinton crooked politician named Hillary Clinton crooked politician named Hillary Clinton. Okay? I don't want to waste a lot of time.
Okay? I don't want to waste a lot of time. Okay? I don't want to waste a lot of time trying to defend ourselves against these, trying to defend ourselves against these, trying to defend ourselves against these phony people that are, I don't know phony people that are, I don't know phony people that are - I don't know, they've Got something, but I watched the - they've got something, but I watched the - they've got something, but I watched the level, the Republican Party really should level the Republican Party really should level.
The Republican Party really should get their act together. They have to come get their act together. They have to come get their act together, they have to come together, we got to win and if for no together we got to win and if for no together we got to win. And if for no other reason the Supreme Court, remember other reason the Supreme Court, remember other reason the Supreme Court remember that for no other reason.
Now I always that for no other reason. Now I always that for no other reason. Now I always say most importantly is defense we got, say most importantly is defense. We got, say most importantly is defense. We got to protect our country, we have a - to protect our country, we have a - to protect our country, we have a military that's totally depleted.
You all military that's totally depleted, you all military that's totally depleted. You all saw on Fox and on CNN, they did separate saw on Fox and on CNN, they did separate saw on Fox and on CNN. They did separate reports where our great great pilots reports where our great, great pilots reports where our great, great pilots, these are these great young people and these are these great young people and these are these great young people and now they're not as young because they've Now they're not as young because they've - now - they're not as young because they've been one of them there for 18 years and been one of them there for 18 years and been one of them there for 18 years.
And he said, you know, when I came in this, he said, you know, when I came in this, he said, you know, when I came in this equipment was beautiful, new nice. Now equipment was beautiful, new nice. Now equipment was beautiful, new nice. Now he's flying the same equipment and it's - he's flying the same equipment and it's - he's flying the same equipment and it's old and it's tied fighter jets, fighter old and it's tied fighter jets, fighter old and it's tied fighter jets, fighter jets.
These are the fighter jets. This is jets, these are the fighter jets, this is jets, these are the fighter jets, this is the United States and the fighter jets, the United States and the fighter jets, the United States and the fighter jets are old and they have no parts for them are Old and they have no parts for them are old and they have no parts for them.
They're so old. So you know what they do. They're so old. So you know what they do. They're so old. So you know what they do for the United States. Our great pilots for the United States, our great pilots for the United States, our great pilots, our best fighter jets, they're going to our best fighter jets.
They're going to our best fighter jets. They're going to the desert, the desert, the desert, where they have - what they call playing, where they have - what they call playing, where they have, what they call playing graveyards. And they're going to museums graveyards and they're going to museums graveyards and they're going to museums where they have these.
They're in museums where they have these - they're in museums where they have these. They're in museums, so, and they're taking the parts from so and they're taking the parts from so and they're taking the parts from the museum and they're taking the parts, the museum and they're taking the parts, the museum and they're taking the parts from the graveyard and They're putting from the graveyard and they're putting from the graveyard and they're putting them on the fighter jets and then our them on the fighter jets and then our them on the fighter jets.
And then our young people, men and women are getting young people. Men and women are getting young people, men and women are getting in these planes and they're flying in these planes and they're flying in these planes and they're flying planes and being shot at that's not planes and being shot at, that's not planes and being shot at.
That's not going to happen anymore. Folks that's not going to happen anymore. Folks that's not going to happen anymore. Folks that's not going to happen anymore going to happen anymore going to happen anymore. We're gonna build up our military and we're gonna build up our military and we're gonna build up our military.
And don't forget when crooked Hillary says, don't forget when crooked Hillary says, don't forget when crooked Hillary says Donald Trump temperament, she's got the Donald Trump temperament. She's got the Donald Trump temperament. She's got the bad temperament and remember what bad temperament and remember what bad temperament and remember what remember what the Secret Service agent.
Remember what the Secret Service agent, remember what the Secret Service agent said. She's a total mess. She's unstable said she's a total mess. She's unstable said she's a total mess, she's unstable, she's unstable and she can't be, she's unstable and she can't be, she's unstable and she can't be President.
That's what they said. So she - President, that's what they said. So she - President, that's what they said. So she uses to think about Trump's temperament uses to think about Trump's temperament uses to think about Trump's temperament. Look, we need strong temperament at first look, we need strong temperament at first.
Look, we need strong temperament at first I was gonna say oh, but I have a good - I was gonna say oh, but I have a good - I was gonna say oh, but I have a good temperament. That's not a question I have temperament. That's not a question I have temperament, that's not a question. I have a strong temperamental.
I'm the one a strong temperamental. I'm the one a strong temperamental I'm - the one didn't want to go into Iraq. Remember didn't want to go into Iraq. Remember, didn't want to go into Iraq. Remember that you know all these people saying that you know all these people saying that you know all these people saying Donald Trump is tough, they talk about.
Donald Trump is tough, they talk about. Donald Trump is tough, they talk about the trigger, right? The nuclear trigger the trigger, right? The nuclear trigger the trigger, right, the nuclear trigger. But let me tell you, I'll probably be the - but let me tell you, I'll probably be the - but let me tell you, I'll probably be the last one to do it.
I hope to god, we never last one to do it. I hope to god, we never. Last one to do it, I hope to god, we never have to do it because that is a disaster, have to do it because that is a disaster, have to do it because that is a disaster. But I'm the one that didn't want to go. But I'm the one that didn't want to go, but I'm the one that didn't want to go into Iraq.
Now I was a civilian, so nobody into Iraq. Now I was a civilian, so nobody into Iraq now I was a civilian, so nobody really cared that much. I was doing my really cared that much. I was doing my really cared that much. I was doing my deals. I mean, you know it's not like old deals. I mean, you know it's not like old deals.
I mean, you know it's not like old. Mr. Trump, what do we do mr. Trump, what do we do? Mr. Trump, what do we do, but I'm dated back way back where I was, but I'm dated back way back where I was, but I'm dated back way back where I was saying no. Iraq, you're gonna destabilize saying no. Iraq, you're gonna destabilize saying no.
Iraq, you're gonna destabilize the Middle East? Oh, by the way, everything the Middle East? Oh, by the way, everything the Middle East? Oh, by the way. Everything I said happened. Everything I said it all I said happened everything I said it all I said happened everything. I said it all happened. The Middle East is destabilized happened, the Middle East is destabilized happened, the Middle East is destabilized.
I said Iran is going to take over Iraq. I said Iran is going to take over Iraq. I said Iran is going to take over Iraq. That's exactly what happened because you - that's exactly what happened because you - that's exactly what happened because you had two powers that were identical in - had two powers that were identical in - had two powers that were identical in terms of military strength and they terms of military strength.
And they terms of military strength and they fight with each other for decades fight with each other for decades fight with each other for decades then go ten feet, ten feet, ten feet, rest then go ten feet, ten feet, ten feet rest then go ten feet, ten Feet ten feet, rest ten feet, ten feet gas would be thrown by ten feet, ten feet gas would be thrown by ten feet.
Ten feet gas would be thrown by Saddam who said the world would go crazy Saddam who said the world would go crazy. Saddam who said the world would go crazy, then Iran throws a little gas than the then Iran throws a little gas than the then Iran throws a little gas than the rest and this went on for decades, right, rest and this went on for decades, right, rest And this went on for decades, right?
Then we knocked the hell out of one of then we knocked the hell out of one of then we knocked the hell out of one of these two nations that hated each other - these two nations that hated each other. These two nations that hated each other and remember this about Iraq, Iraq has - and remember this about Iraq, Iraq has - and remember this about Iraq, Iraq has among the biggest oil reserves in the - among the biggest oil reserves in the - among the biggest oil reserves in the World, so not only did we give Iran one world, so not only did we give Iran one world.
So not only did we give Iran one of the great deals of the century when of the great deals of the century when of the great deals of the century, when our very, very incompetent Secretary of our very, very incompetent Secretary of our very, very incompetent Secretary. Of State John Kerry grossly incompetent State John Kerry grossly incompetent State John Kerry grossly incompetent this guy never got up from the table.
This guy never got up from the table. This guy never got up from the table once to walk. How do you make a deal with once to walk, how do you make a deal with once to walk, how do you make a deal with people? And they're great negotiators. The people and they're great negotiators, the people and they're great negotiators, the Persians, they're great negotiators.
How Persians they're great negotiators, how Persians they're great negotiators, how do you not get up once twice? And I used do you not get up once twice and I used do you not get up once twice and I used to hear what they're doing. I used to - to hear what they're doing. I used to, to hear what they're doing.
I used to follow it. I love it. You know deals, I follow it. I love it. You know deals, I follow it. I love it. You know deals, I love deals. I mean, frankly, any deal - I love deals, I mean, frankly, any deal, I love deals. I mean, frankly, any deal, I love deals, but here's one that was so love deals.
But here's one that was so love deals. But here's one that was so obvious, and they'd say no and would say obvious and they'd say no and would say obvious and they'd say no and would say, well, we'd like to have this. No. Oh, okay. Well, we'd like to have this, no. Oh, okay. Well, we'd like to have this, no.
Oh, okay, how about this? No? Okay, we agree. And then how about this? No? Okay, we agree. And then how about this? No? Okay, we agree. And then the guy goes into a bicycle race, he's 73. The guy goes into a bicycle race, he's 73. The guy goes into a bicycle race, he's 73 years old. He wants to be in a bicycle years old.
He wants to be in a bicycle years old. He wants to be in a bicycle race. He breaks his leg, just walking race, he breaks his leg, just walking race, he breaks his leg, just walking around like can you believe in the around like can you believe in the around like can you believe in the middle of the biggest negotiation.
He middle of the biggest negotiation, he middle of the biggest negotiation. He goes into a bicycle race, he breaks his goes into a bicycle race, he breaks his goes into a bicycle race, he breaks his leg and he's incapacitated and then a leg and he's incapacitated. And then a leg and he's incapacitated and then a few weeks later, he walks in on crutches few weeks later.
He walks in on crutches few weeks later. He walks in on crutches and you know what they're saying to each and you know what they're saying to each and you know what they're saying to each other, how dumb is this guy, how dumb this other, how dumb is this guy, how dumb this other, how Dumb is this guy, how dumb this is the kind of people we have and we is the kind of people we have and we is the kind of people we have and we have the prisoners and they're over, have the prisoners and they're over have the prisoners.
And they're over there and that negotiation should have there and that negotiation should have there. And that negotiation should have never ever started unless those never ever started unless those never ever started. Unless those prisoners were released before it prisoners were released before it prisoners were released before it started and the first meeting should started and the first meeting should started.
And the first meeting should have been with John Kerry or anybody have been with John Kerry or anybody have been with John Kerry or anybody saying, sorry folks, we cannot do this saying, sorry folks, we cannot do this saying, sorry folks, we cannot do this negotiation as Long as you are holding negotiation, as long as you are holding negotiation, as long as you are holding our hostages, we can't do and they'll say our hostages, we can't do and they'll say our hostages we can't do and they'll say no way we're not going to Do it - and then no way we're not going to do it and then no way we're not going to do it.
And then we say, sorry, but we have to - and we leave, we say sorry, but we have to - and we leave, we say sorry, but we have to - and we leave the room, we get back in the plane, we - the room we get back in the plane. We - the room, we get back in the plane, we double up the sanctions and by the time double up the sanctions and by the time double up the sanctions.
And by the time you get back to the United States, you get back to the United States, you get back to the United States, there'll be a phone call. The prisoners, there'll be a phone call. The prisoners, there'll be a phone call. The prisoners are released. Let's get going okay, are released, let's get going okay, are released, let's get going.
Okay. I wanted two big things in that. First of I wanted two big things in that. First of I wanted two big things in that. First of all, you I owe anything nuclear. If you all you, I owe anything nuclear, if you all you, I owe anything nuclear. If you can make good deals in nuclear, that's a can make good deals in nuclear, that's a can make good deals in nuclear.
That's a good thing. I have to say. I'm all for good thing. I have to say I'm all for good thing. I have to say I'm all for deals, but they got ta be good deals, not deals but they got ta be good deals, not deals but they got ta be good deals, not bad deals. We make bad deals, we don't bad deals, we make bad deals.
We don't bad deals, we make bad deals, we don't have anybody to make good deals. We don't have anybody to make good deals. We don't have anybody to make good deals. We don't have people that are smart, have people that are smart, have people that are smart. We don't have deal makers. We have - we don't have deal makers.
We have - we don't have deal makers, we have political. I won't say it. I won't say it political. I won't say it. I won't say it political. I won't say it. I won't say it because I'll get in trouble, you know, because I'll get in trouble. You know, because I'll get in trouble. You know when I use a slightly off word slightly when I use a slightly off word slightly when I use a slightly off word, slightly off when I call this really bad senator off when I call this really bad senator off when I call this really bad Senator she's done nothing.
She's done. Nothing. She's done. Nothing. She's done. Nothing. She's done. Nothing. She's done. Nothing. She said she's Native American and I - she said she's Native American and I - she said she's Native American and I said Pocahontas Pocahontas. And somebody said to me one of the media and somebody said to me one of the media and somebody said to me one of the media, mr.
Trump, would you apologize, I said yes, mr. Trump, would you apologize, I said yes, mr. Trump, would you apologize. I said, yes, I'll apologize to Pocahontas, I will - I'll apologize to Pocahontas, I will - I'll apologize to Pocahontas, I will apologize because Pocahontas is insulted, apologize because Pocahontas is insulted, apologize because Pocahontas is insulted by the statement now.
I mean we - this is by the statement now. I mean, we - this is by the statement now. I mean we - this is what we're dealing with folks. This is what we're dealing with folks. This is what we're dealing with folks. This is what we're dealing with. We have to get what we're dealing with. We have to get what we're dealing with.
We have to get smart, we have to get tough, we have to smart, we have to get tough, we have to smart, we have to get tough, we have to stop being so politically correct, the stop being so politically correct, the stop being so politically correct. The Republican Party, the Republican Party, Republican Party, the Republican Party, Republican Party, the Republican Party and our leaders, we've got to get down to and our leaders, we've got to get down to and our leaders, we've got to get down to business.
We can't be - I mean, I've had business we can't be - I mean, I've had business we can't be - I mean, I've had more opposition from the Republican more opposition from the Republican, more opposition from the Republican Party than I do from the Democrats. It's Party than I do from the Democrats, it's Party than I do from the Democrats.
It's crazy, crazy, crazy. With that being said, I think it's coming. With that being said, I think it's coming. With that being said, I think it's coming together. I think it's coming to get together. I think it's coming to get together. I think it's coming to get - don't forget I'm an outsider, they're not - don't forget I'm an outsider, they're not.
Don't forget I'm an outsider, they're not used to it. You know we had 18 people and used to it, you know we had 18 people and used to it. You know we had 18 people and then one after another boom boom boom then one after another boom boom boom then one after another boom boom, boom, boom. And some of it wasn't nice, you know, boom and some of it wasn't nice, you know, boom and some of it wasn't nice.
You know, Jeb Bush was favored to win. And I would Jeb Bush was favored to win. And I would Jeb Bush was favored to win and I would say he doesn't like me too much, you know, say he doesn't like me too much, you know, say he doesn't like me too much. You know what's interesting guys, there were a - what's interesting guys, there were a - what's interesting guys, there were a number of them, but a number of them, but number of them, but a number of them, but number of them, but a number of them.
But they signed the pledge, the reason they - they signed the pledge, the reason they - they signed the pledge, the reason they wanted the pledge was because of me they wanted - the pledge was because of me they wanted - the pledge was because of me, they wanted me to Sign the pledge, I would wanted me to sign the pledge.
I would wanted me to sign the pledge. I would have honored the pledge if I didn't make - have honored the pledge if I didn't make - have honored the pledge. If I didn't make it, I would have wanted the pledge and it it. I would have wanted the pledge and it it. I would have wanted the pledge and it would have been hard to do actually would have been hard to do.
Actually would have been hard to do actually because for some of them it would have because for some of them it would have because for some of them it would have been very hard to do. But I would have been very hard to do. But I would have been very hard to do, but I would have honored the pledge so they signed a honored the pledge so they signed a honored the pledge.
So they signed a pledge. They go into the RNC, they use all pledge, they go into the RNC, they use all pledge, they go into the RNC, they use all of their information because they signed of their information because they signed of their information because they signed the pledge, the pledge, the Pledge, so they took, I guess you could say, so they took, I guess you could say.
So they took, I guess you could say millions of dollars worth of free millions of dollars worth of free millions of dollars worth of free information and then they lose and they information and then they lose and they information and then they lose and they don't honor The pledge, you know, I'm from - don't honor the pledge, you know I'm from - don't honor the pledge.
You know I'm from business. We sort of have to do things business. We sort of have to do things business. We sort of have to do things like we honor things, so they sign a like we honor things. So they sign a like we honor things. So they sign a pledge, they don't honor a pledge. So the pledge, they don't honor a pledge.
So the pledge, they don't honor a pledge. So the Republican Party has to be tough, has to - Republican Party has to be tough, has to - Republican Party has to be tough, has to be smart. And if they're not tough and be smart and if they're not tough and be smart and if they're not tough and smart, I'm gonna win, but a lot of other smart - I'm gonna win, but a lot of other smart - I'm gonna win, but a Lot of other people won't - I'm telling you that's people won't.
I'm telling you that's people won't. I'm telling you that's what's going to happen. We have a couple what's going to happen. We have a couple what's going to happen. We have a couple of senators we don't want to endorse of senators. We don't want to endorse of senators. We don't want to endorse Trump, that's okay.
I don't care if they Trump, that's okay. I don't care if they Trump, that's okay. I don't care if they don't endorse me, that's fine. I'm not - don't endorse me that's fine. I'm not - don't endorse me that's fine. I'm not gonna campaign, I have one or two states gonna campaign, I have one or two states gonna campaign.
I have one or two states where I'm leading in this where I'm leading in this where I'm leading in this and they're doing poorly and they don't and they're doing poorly and they don't and they're doing poorly and they don't want to endorse me. And I'm saying what want to endorse me and I'm saying what want to endorse me and I'm saying what the hell are they doing?
You know what the hell are they doing? You know what the hell are they doing? You know, what are they doing? And I don't care, but we are - they doing and I don't care, but we are - they doing and I don't care, but we could have a case where I win and many could have a case where I win and many could have a case where I win And many others don't, and I'll tell you what's others don't and I'll tell you what's others don't.
And I'll tell you what's going to happen if that happens that I going to happen. If that happens that I going to happen, if that happens that I have a Senate without the majority which have a Senate without the majority, which have a Senate without the majority, which would be bad because I'd love to see the would be bad because I'd love To see the would be bad because I'd love to see the majority, I was with Mitch yesterday.
I majority I was with Mitch yesterday. I majority I was with Mitch yesterday. I would love to see the majority, but the would love to see the majority, but the would love to see the majority, but the Republicans have to stick together. They Republicans have to stick together. They Republicans have to stick together, they have to be smart and they have to be - have to be smart and they have to be - have to be smart and they have to be tough because you know one thing I'll tough because you know one thing I'll tough Because you know, one thing I'll say about the Democrats to a much say about the Democrats to a much say about the Democrats to a much greater degree, they stick together, they greater degree, they stick together, they greater degree, they stick together, they stick together much more.
So than the stick together, much more so than the stick together much more so than the Republicans nobody's ever been able to Republicans. Nobody's ever been able to Republicans. Nobody's ever been able to explain why, but the Republicans have to. Explain why, but the Republicans have to explain why, but the Republicans have to be tough because we have the better be tough because we have the better be tough because we have the better ideas.
We have the better ideas and my ideas we have the better ideas and my ideas we have, the better ideas and my ideas are better than any of them. Ideas are better than any of them. Ideas are better than any of them. Believe me, my ideas are better than any because many people, Democrat and because many people, Democrat and because many people, Democrat and Republican say you're too tough on trade.
Republican say you're too tough on trade. Republican say you're too tough on trade too tough. I'm not too tough on trade too tough. I'm not too tough on trade too tough. I'm not too tough on trade when we lose five hundred and five when we lose five hundred and five, when we lose five hundred and five billion dollars, we have a trade deficit billion dollars.
We have a trade deficit billion dollars. We have a trade deficit with China, five hundred and five billion with China, five hundred and five billion with China, five hundred and five billion dollars. And then they say you're being a dollars and then they say you're being a dollars and then they say you're being a little bit tough on China.
We have little bit tough on China. We have little bit tough on China. We have rebuilt China folks, we've rebuilt it, you rebuilt China folks, we've rebuilt it, you rebuilt China folks, we've rebuilt it, you go there, you see airports the likes of go there, you see airports the likes of go there, you see airports, the likes of which we've Never seen which we've never seen, which we've never seen.
You see trains that go 250 miles an hour. You see trains that go 250 miles an hour. You see trains that go 250 miles an hour. We have the Long Island Railroad, which we have the Long Island Railroad, which we have the Long Island Railroad, which is always here to buy a heart chug chug is always here to buy a heart chug.
Chug is always here to buy a heart chug chug, chug, chug. We will be out of service for chug chug. We will be out of service for chug chug. We will be out of service for the next one week. We're fixing the - the next one week. We're fixing the - the next one week, we're fixing the tracks you know now, I mean it's a whole tracks you know now I mean it's a whole tracks you know now I mean it's a whole different thing.
The trip train the Trump trains that house who said the Trump trains that house who said the Trump trains that house who said that, who said that somebody over there that who said that somebody over there that who said that somebody over there said we got the Truck tray, that's a very said we got the truck tray, that's a very said we got the truck tray, that's a very good a, I would have never thought of good a, I would have never thought of good a.
I would have never thought of that one. I like that one. I like that one I like. Well, the Trump train is going 600 miles well. The Trump train is going 600 miles well. The Trump train is going 600 miles an hour, folks, I'll tell you that. But - but an hour folks, I'll tell you that, but - but an hour folks, I'll tell you that.
But - but we've got China and they laugh at us. We've got China and they laugh at us. We've got China and they laugh at us. They think we're stupid people. They - they think we're stupid people, they - they think we're stupid people. They think we're like our leaders. They look - think we're like our leaders.
They look - think we're like our leaders. They look at all of us and all of us have at all of us and all of us have at all of us and all of us have discussed and that's why I'm doing well discussed and that's why I'm doing well discussed and that's why I'm doing Well, I mean this is my first stop in Florida, I mean this is my first stop in Florida.
I mean this is my first stop in Florida. My first campaign stuff, you know again my first campaign stuff, you know again my first campaign stuff, you know, again everybody said, oh, wait till after the everybody said, oh, wait till after the everybody said, oh, wait till after the convention. I can't wait.
I'm dying to get convention, I can't wait, I'm dying to get convention. I can't wait. I'm dying to get going. What am I going to do play around going? What am I going to do play around going? What am I going to do play around a golf? It's boring, I want to do this, I want to do this, but then you have Mexico want to do this, but then you have Mexico want to do this.
But then you have Mexico. Mexico is ripping us off so badly folks. Mexico is ripping us off so badly folks. Mexico is ripping us off so badly folks, Mexico is killing us. Mexico and not Mexico is killing us. Mexico and not Mexico is killing us Mexico and not nothing against Mexican leaders, nothing against Mexican leaders, nothing against Mexican leaders.
I have respect in fact one of them I have respect. In fact one of them I have respect. In fact one of them Vincente Fox, he was the President of Vincente Fox. He was the President of Vincente Fox. He was the President of Mexico. He was on CNN, it's all right. And Mexico, he was on CNN, it's all right. And Mexico, he was on CNN, it's all right.
And he said we will never pay for that and he said we will never pay for that. And he said we will never pay for that and he used the F word right. And I said all he used the F word right. And I said all he used the F word right. And I said all he's going to get killed using the F he's going to get killed using the F he's going to get killed using the F word.
Can you imagine if I use the F bomb word, can you imagine if I use the F bomb word, can you imagine if I use the F bomb, it would be the electric chair. Here's a - it would be the electric chair. Here's a - it would be the electric chair, here's a guy and he used the FPS and we will guy and he used the FPS and we will guy and he used the FPS and we will never pay for that f-bomb wall, right?
I never pay for that. F-bomb wall, right? I never pay for that f-bomb wall, right? I said, oh, he's dead. Nobody even mentioned, said, oh, he's dead. Nobody even mentioned, said, oh, he's dead. Nobody even mentioned it. Nobody had mentioned it. But I was it. Nobody had mentioned it. But I was it, nobody had mentioned it, but I was happy because a year ago and two years happy because a year ago and two years happy because a year ago and two years ago, he said we'll never have a wall now ago.
He said we'll never have a wall now ago. He said we'll never have a wall. Now he's saying we'll never pay for the wall. He's saying we'll never pay for the wall. He's saying we'll never pay for the wall, so he's assuming the walls going to. So he's assuming the walls going to - so he's assuming the walls going to happen, happen happen and just folks ready America, first very simple folks ready America.
First very simple folks ready America. First very simple America for its America, you got to build America for its America. You got to build America for its America, you got to build the wall, you know the wall, you know the wall, you know 16500 Border Patrol agents endorsed me 16500 Border Patrol agents endorsed me 16500 Border Patrol agents endorsed me.
They endorsed me about three weeks ago. They endorsed me about three weeks ago. They endorsed me about three weeks ago and I was very honored by that because - and I was very honored by that because - and I was very honored by that because they have never endorsed a presidential. They have never endorsed a presidential.
They have never endorsed a presidential candidate before. And by the way, before I candidate before and by the way, before I candidate before and by the way, before I forget the NRA, the National Rifle, forget the NRA, the National Rifle, forget the NRA, the National Rifle Association, endorsed me last week and Association endorsed me Last week and Association endorsed me last week and for you incredible folks in Tampa you for you, incredible folks in Tampa.
You for you, incredible folks in Tampa. You know, Hillary Clinton wants to abolish know. Hillary Clinton wants to abolish know, Hillary Clinton wants to abolish the Second Amendment. She wants over she. The Second Amendment she wants over she. The Second Amendment she wants over, she wants to take, you guys wants to take - you guys wants to take you guys who has guns in this place, Wow!
Wow! And who has guns in this place, Wow! Wow! And who has guns in this place, Wow! Wow! And what would you say if somebody came, what would you say if somebody came, what would you say if somebody came along and said we want to take that gun along and said we want to take that gun along and said we want to take that gun Away from you, she wants to take your guns away.
That's she wants to take your guns away. That's she wants to take your guns away. That's what she wants to do. She wants to take what she wants to do. She wants to take what she wants to do. She wants to take your guns away. Essentially she wants to your guns away. Essentially she wants to your guns away.
Essentially, she wants to abolish the Second Amendment and you abolish the Second Amendment and you abolish the Second Amendment. And you know, when you look at Paris, where they know when you look at Paris, where they know when you look at Paris where they had a hundred and thirty people killed, had a hundred and thirty people killed, had a hundred and thirty people killed viciously.
And it's just boom, boom, boom viciously and it's just boom, boom, boom viciously and it's just boom, boom, boom, boom, boom, boom, hundreds of people went to the hospital, hundreds of people went to the hospital, hundreds of people went to the hospital. Many, many of those people are still many, many of those people are still many, many of those people are still there.
They'll never be the same just there. They'll never be the same just there. They'll never be the same, just destroyed, right, destroyed, totally destroyed, right? Destroyed totally destroyed, right, destroyed, totally destroyed if there were guns on the destroyed, if there were guns on the destroyed, if there were guns on the other side of that room or if in San other side of that room or if in San other side of that Room or if in San Bernardino 14 people killed by radical Bernardino 14 people killed by radical Bernardino.
14 people killed by radical Islamic terrorists who became Islamic terrorists who became Islamic terrorists who became radicalized and these were people that radicalized and these were people that radicalized and these were people that gave a baby shower to the child of these, gave a baby shower to The child of these gave a baby shower to the child of these people that killed them.
I mean what's people that killed them, I mean what's people that killed them, I mean, what's going on? We got to know what's going on going on. We got to know what's going on going on. We got to know what's going on here. Folks, 14 people killed many people here, folks, 14 people killed many people here, folks, 14 people killed many people in the hospital to this day, okay, in the hospital to this day, okay, in the hospital to this day, okay, 14 people.
Okay. Let me tell you if you 14 people, okay, let me tell you if you 14 people, okay. Let me tell you if you - with a beautiful red hat, make America with a beautiful red hat, make America with a beautiful red hat, make America great again. This woman here with the great - again this woman here with the great - again this woman here with the blue.
If a cut - if a few of you had a gun blue, if a cut - if a few of you had a gun blue, if a cut - if a few of you had a gun right here or a gun around the ankle of right here or a gun Around the ankle of right here or a gun around the ankle of bullets were flying in the other bullets were flying in the other bullets were flying in the other direction, direction, direction number one.
They may never have come into number one. They may never have come into number one, they may never have come into the place because it would have said the place because it would have said the place because it would have said their guns in there. I don't want to go their guns in there. I don't want to go their guns in there.
I don't want to go in there, but at a minimum, the carnage in there, but at a minimum, the carnage in there, but at a minimum, the carnage would have been very, very, very, would have been very, very, very, would have been very, very, very substantially less. Let the bullets go in substantially less, let the bullets go in substantially less let the bullets go in the other direction.
The other direction, the other direction bom-bom-bom, believe me, bom-bom-bom, believe me, bom-bom-bom, believe me, philately remember when our five great philately remember when our five great philately remember when our five great soldiers a little more than a year ago. Soldiers, a little more than a year ago.
Soldiers, a little more than a year ago were killed. These were five great were killed. These were five great were killed. These were five great soldiers. One of them was like a soldiers, one of them was like a soldiers, one of them was like a world-class marksman. And on a military, world-class marksman and on a military, world-class marksman and on a military base, there was a gun-free zone.
Can you base - there was a gun-free zone. Can you base - there was a gun-free zone. Can you imagine having a gun-free zone on a imagine having a gun-free zone on a imagine having a gun-free zone on a military base? These people are about military base. These people are about military base. These people are about guns and they know how to use guns and guns and they know how to use guns and guns and they know how to use guns and they're protecting us with guns.
So they - they're protecting us with guns, so they - they're protecting us with guns. So they have a gun-free zone. These are five have a gun-free zone. These are five have a gun-free zone. These are five great soldiers, one of them world-class, great soldiers, one of them world-class, great soldiers, one of them world-class marksman, one of the top there is so marksman, one of the top there is.
So marksman one of the top there is. So they're sitting there. Their guns are - they're sitting there, their guns are - they're sitting there, their guns are probably 200 yards away in a safe for probably 200 yards away in a safe for probably 200 yards away in a safe for something. And they're sitting there.
And something and they're sitting there and something and they're sitting there and this whack job, walks in and kills them, this whack, job, walks in and kills them, this whack, job, walks in and kills them all. There wasn't a thing they could do all. There wasn't a thing they could do all. There wasn't a thing they could do.
So we're gonna make things right again. So we're gonna make things right again. So we're gonna make things right again in this country. Folks, we're gonna make in this country, folks we're gonna make in this country, folks, we're gonna make things right, things right, things, right? We're gonna make great trade deals.
We're - we're gonna make great trade deals. We're - we're gonna make great trade deals, we're gonna build the wall, we're gonna build gonna build the wall, we're gonna build gonna build the wall, we're gonna build the wall and okay, are you ready? Who's the wall? And okay, are you ready who's the wall?
And okay, are you ready? Who's gonna pay for the wall better? Believe, gonna pay for the wall better, believe, gonna pay for the wall better, believe you better, believe it. So and we're gonna you better believe it. So and we're gonna you better believe it. So - and we're gonna end up having a great relationship with end up having a great relationship with end up having a great relationship with Mexico.
We're gonna end up having a great Mexico, we're gonna end up having a great Mexico. We're gonna end up having a great relationship with China. Mexico will pay relationship with China. Mexico will pay relationship with China. Mexico will pay for the wall. You know, when I was on the - for the wall, you know, when I was on the - for the wall, you know, when I was on the stage with the debates, I didn't know stage with the debates.
I didn't know stage with the debates. I didn't know what I was getting, I never debated what I was getting. I never debated what I was getting. I never debated professionally before many of these professionally before many of these professionally before many of these politicians. That's what they do. That's politicians.
That's what they do, that's politicians, that's what they do. That's what you know. It's all talk no action what you know. It's all talk no action what you know. It's all talk no action stuff. So that's what they do. They debate stuff. So that's what they do. They debate stuff, so that's what they do. They debate they don't get anything done, they debate they don't get anything done, they debate they don't get anything done, they debate.
So I went on every single poll of every. So I went on every single poll of every. So I went on every single poll of every single debate and I have to what I say single debate and I have to what I say single debate and I have to what I say this all this, you know sleazy people, this all this you know sleazy People this all this, you know sleazy people back there in the president.
So I have to back there in the president. So I have to back there in the president. So I have to be careful, but when I debate every single debate, but when I debate every single debate, but when I debate every single debate, every single poll, now you have Drudge a every single poll. Now you have Drudge a every single poll.
Now you have Drudge a fantastic guy, fantastic guy, fantastic guy, you have Time magazine, you have slate, you have Time magazine, you have slate, you have Time magazine, you have slate, you have all these different polls. You - you have all these different polls, you - you have all these different polls, you don't have that polls now for everything don't have that polls now for everything don't have that polls now for everything, they have a poll for everything.
No, they have a poll for everything. No, they have a poll for everything no matter what it is. If you go to the matter what it is, if you go to the matter what it is, if you go to the bathroom, they have a poll how many times bathroom they have a poll, how many times bathroom they have a poll, how many times in a Day, but they have a poll for in a day, but they have a poll for in a day, but they have a poll for everything and every single poll of everything and every single poll of everything and every single poll of every single debate they had me Winning every single debate, they had me winning every single debate, they had me winning the debate.
Is that good? Is that good? The debate, is that good? Is that good? The debate, is that good? Is that good every single and which was a great honor every single and which was a great honor every single and which was a great honor. But when I look at it, and here's the - but when I look at it and here's the - but when I look at it and here's the thing I was center stage in every debate thing.
I was center stage in every debate thing. I was center stage in every debate, you know, the way guys kept falling off, you know, the way guys kept falling off, you know, the way guys kept falling off the ends, you know, they kept falling off the ends. You know, they kept falling off the ends. You know they kept falling off.
I said Jeff, you're not gonna be here. I said Jeff, you're not gonna be here. I said Jeff, you're not gonna be here much longer. You're pretty far down there much longer. You're pretty far down there much longer. You're pretty far down there, Jemma, you're not gonna be here much Jemma, you're not gonna be here much Jemma, you're not gonna be here much longer, Jeb.
You got ta get tougher, Jeb, I - longer Jeb, you got ta get tougher, Jeb, I - longer Jeb, you got ta get tougher, Jeb. I don't think he's going to endorse me. Do don't think he's going to endorse me? Do don't think he's going to endorse me? Do you folks - I don't think who the hell you folks, I don't think who the hell you folks, I don't think who the hell cares, who cares, cares, who cares, cares, who cares.
But - and by the way, I'm very nice to a - but - and by the way, I'm very nice to a - but - and by the way, I'm very nice to a lot of the people that I won against. I lot of the people that I won against I lot of the people that I won against, I don't even use the word that I've don't even use the word that I've don't even use the word that I've defeated.
I want to be nicer than that defeated. I want to be nicer than that defeated. I want to be nicer than that because some of them are good. I mean, because some of them are good, I mean, because some of them are good. I mean, Rick Perry is an example governor of Rick Perry is an example governor of Rick Perry is an example governor of Texas, very good guy.
I always liked him. Texas very good guy. I always liked him. Texas very good guy. I always liked him, but he became very vicious in the debate, but he became very vicious in the debate. But he became very vicious in the debate and he actually went to the Washington and he actually went to the Washington and he actually went to the Washington Press Club and did a beautiful job.
He Press Club and did a beautiful job. He Press Club and did a beautiful job. He did a speech and he did a beautiful, did a speech and he did a beautiful, did a speech and he did a beautiful Japanese said Donald Trump is a cancer. Japanese said Donald Trump is a cancer. Japanese said Donald Trump is a cancer on the Republican Party.
I said man on the Republican Party, I said man on the Republican Party, I said man that's tough, that's tough, that's tough, whoa. And it was, you know, like a half an whoa and it was, you know, like a half an whoa and it was, you know, like a half an hour of this stuff. And then he was off I hour of this stuff and then he was off I hour of this stuff and then he was off.
I was very tough on him by the way, but he was very tough on him by the way. But he was very tough on him by the way, but he was off - I mean don't have a right to be was off. I mean don't have a right to be was off. I mean don't have a right to be with that. So he was out then he came with that. So he was out then he came with that.
So he was out then he came back, didn't call me. And he said I back, didn't call me and he said I back, didn't call me. And he said, I endorsed Donald Trump and he's maybe the endorsed Donald Trump and he's maybe the endorsed Donald Trump and he's maybe the smartest person ever to run for smartest person ever to run for smartest person ever to run for president.
How about that? What a president - how about that, what a president, how about that, what a difference, what I think what a difference, what I think what a difference, what I think what a difference and I called him and I difference and I called him and I difference and I Called him and I thanked him and I understand it's thanked him and I understand it's thanked him and I understand it's politics and it's tough stuff.
But I politics and it's tough stuff, but I politics and it's tough stuff. But I appreciate when people are respectful, appreciate when people are respectful, appreciate when people are respectful and you know, you can lose and you show and you know, you can lose and you show and you know you can lose and you show respect.
But I appreciate it. And we have respect, but I appreciate it and we have respect, but I appreciate it and we have some good people. We had some good people, some good people. We had some good people, some good people. We had some good people on that stage and we have some great on that stage and we have some great on that stage and we have some great people in the Republican Party, everybody people in the Republican Party, everybody people in the Republican Party.
Everybody wants to know who I'm going to choose, wants to know who I'm going to choose, wants to know who I'm going to choose for vice president, who do you like for vice president who do you like for vice president, who do you like he's. He says Newt hooyah, they say sessions sessions, they say sessions sessions, they say sessions sessions, he says condi rice who else ooh do you like who else ooh do you like?
Who else ooh do you like? I've never done this before. This is fun. I've never done this before. This is fun. I've never done this before. This is fun. This is - we have a lot of good people. This is - we have a lot of good people. This is - we have a lot of good people, you'll be happy. Well, you're going to be - you'll be happy.
Well, you're going to be - you'll be happy. Well, you're going to be happy and we have some unbelievable happy and we have some unbelievable happy. And we have some unbelievable people for different positions like people for different positions like people for different positions like Homeland Security, like Attorney, General, Homeland Security, like Attorney, General, Homeland Security, like Attorney General.
Don't forget with Hillary, don't forget, don't forget with Hillary, don't forget, don't forget with Hillary, don't forget with Hillary, with Hillary, with Hillary, you got a six-year statute of you got a six-year statute of you got a six-year statute of limitations, folks, because honestly we're being 100 %, because honestly, we're being 100 % because honestly, we're being 100 % straight look what's happening with straight look, what's happening with straight look, what's happening with Hillary Clinton is a disgrace.
Hillary Clinton is a disgrace. Hillary Clinton is a disgrace. She's broken the laws of our land. She's - she's broken the laws of our land, she's she's broken the laws of our land. She's made us totally vulnerable from a - made us totally vulnerable from a - made us totally vulnerable from a national security standpoint.
She was national security standpoint, she was national security standpoint. She was Secretary of State what she did with her Secretary of State, what she did with her Secretary of State. What she did with her server is illegal. It's wrong both on a server is illegal, it's wrong. Both on a server is illegal, it's wrong both on a common-sense basis and on a legal basis, common-sense basis and on a legal basis, common-sense basis.
And on a legal basis, it's wrong, it's wrong. And it looks to me it's wrong, it's wrong. And it looks to me it's wrong, it's wrong. And it looks to me like nothing's going to happen to her like nothing's going to happen to her like nothing's going to happen to her because it's a rigged system folks. It's because it's a rigged system folks.
It's because it's a rigged system folks, it's a rigged system. So we're gonna find out a rigged system. So we're gonna find out a rigged system. So we're gonna find out, we're gonna find out. But it looks to me we're gonna find out, but it looks to me we're gonna find out. But it looks to me like nothing's going to happen like nothing's going to happen like nothing's going to happen.
Why would they let it go so long? You - why would they let it go so long you why would they let it go so long? You know, why would they let it go so long? Know why would they let it go so long know why would they let it go so long and then Obama endorses a person and and then Obama endorses a person and and then Obama endorses a person.
And Josh earnest yesterday said essentially Josh earnest yesterday said essentially Josh earnest yesterday said essentially that this is a criminal investigation that this is a criminal investigation that this is a criminal investigation. Now I think he - when he said that they now I think he - when he said that they now I think he when he said that they probably went nuts in the White House, probably went nuts in the White House, probably went nuts in the White House.
And a lot of people said he wasn't and a lot of people said he wasn't and a lot of people said he wasn't supposed to say that, but he probably supposed to say that. But he probably supposed to say that. But he probably said the truth. But when you get right, said the truth, but when you get right, said the truth, but when you get right down to it, how do you endorse somebody down to it?
How do you endorse somebody down to it? How do you endorse somebody that's under criminal investigation? And that's under criminal investigation and that's under criminal investigation and we'll have to see what happens folks, but we'll have to see what happens folks. But we'll have to see what happens folks.
But people that have done 5 % of what she's people that have done 5 % of what she's people that have done 5 % of what she's done, done, done, whether it's General Petraeus or many, whether it's General Petraeus or many, whether it's General Petraeus or many Others, they've done nothing compared to others.
They've done nothing compared to others. They've done nothing compared to what she's done. They have been forced to what she's done. They have been forced to what she's done. They have been forced to pay a price that you wouldn't believe pay a price that you wouldn't believe pay a price that you wouldn't believe it's destroyed their lives.
And Hillary, it's destroyed their lives. And Hillary, it's destroyed their lives and Hillary is out there campaigning and saying 100 % is out there campaigning and saying 100 % is out there campaigning and saying 100 % certain that nothing happens. Did you see certain that nothing happens? Did you see certain that nothing happens?
Did you see that the other day 100 %, who's a hundred that the other day, 100 %, who's a hundred that the other day, 100 %, who's a hundred percent certain about anything? She's a percent certain about anything, she's a percent certain about anything, she's a hundred percent certain. How can she be a hundred percent certain?
How can she be a hundred percent certain? How can she be a hundred percent? What she did, you know, hundred percent. What she did, you know, hundred percent what she did, you know, when you watch all of the pundits, when - when you watch all of the pundits, when when you watch all of the pundits, when you watched they bring in the lawyers, you watched, they bring in the Lawyers, you watched they bring in the lawyers and I read it and I see it and I study and I read it and I see it and I study and I read it and I see it and I study it and I have great lawyers and every It and I have great lawyers and every it and I have great lawyers and every one of them says to me, guilty you very one of them says to me, guilty you very one of them says to me, guilty you very rarely see a lawyer that says Not guilty.
Rarely see a lawyer that says not guilty, rarely see a lawyer that says not guilty. All right. So let's say even if it was all right. So let's say even if it was all right. So let's say even if it was 90 %, 90 %, 90 %, but I don't even know if I see anybody, but I don't even know if I see anybody, but I don't even know if I see anybody that says done, she's guilty.
So how is that says, done? She's guilty. So how is that says, done? She's guilty. So how is she allowed to run for president now she allowed to run for president now she allowed to run for president. Now with that being said, I really want to - with that being said, I really want to - with that being said, I really want to run against her.
I have to be honest run against her. I have to be honest run against her. I have to be honest, that's the one we want to run against. So that's the one we want to run against. So that's the one we want to run against. So we're going to build the wall. We're - we're going to build the wall, we're - we're going to build the wall, we're going to make great trade deals with going to make great trade deals with going to make great trade deals with Mexico.
And what happened is these guys, Mexico and what happened is these guys, Mexico and what happened is these guys would come off the stage and at the - would come off the stage and at the - would come off the stage. And at the beginning, like early on the debates, they beginning like early on the debates, they beginning like early on the debates, they come - you're not really serious about the come.
You're not really serious about the come. You're not really serious about the wall. You can't really build a wall and wall, you can't really build a wall and wall. You can't really build a wall. And I'd say, listen, let me tell you, I'm not - I'd say - listen, let me tell you, I'm not - I'd say, listen, let me tell you, I'm not gonna mention names, but a lot of people gonna mention names, but a lot of people gonna mention Names, but a lot of people were saying a lot of politicians say were saying a lot of politicians say were saying a lot of politicians say because they don't know anything about because they don't know anything about because they don't know anything about building.
How many people not have build building, how many people not have build building, how many people not have build here? I love builders, you know, I'm here. I love builders. You know I'm here. I love builders. You know, I'm building the old post office in building the old post office in building the old post office in Washington DC, one of the most Washington DC, one of the most Washington DC, one of the most sought-after properties in the history sought-after properties in the history.
Sought-after properties in the history of the General Services Administration of the General Services Administration of the General Services Administration, GSA like that's like the landlord of the GSA, like that's like the landlord of the GSA like that's like the landlord of the country and great people.
By the way I country and great people by the way I country and great people by the way, I got it one of the most sought after they got it, one of the most sought after they got it, one of the most sought after they were everybody Wanted it, I got it were everybody wanted it. I got it were everybody wanted it.
I got it because of a strong financial statement because of a strong financial statement because of a strong financial statement. They want to make sure it got finished. They want to make sure it got finished. They want to make sure it got finished very strong balance sheet number one and very strong balance sheet, number one and very strong balance sheet, number one.
And number two, they liked my vision. So number two, they liked my vision. So number two, they liked my vision. So here's the story. I'm much more than a - here's the story. I'm much more than a - here's the story. I'm much more than a year ahead of schedule. And in fact, I'll year ahead of schedule and in fact, I'll year ahead of schedule.
And in fact, I'll tell you a little story, I'm two years tell you a little story. I'm two years tell you a little story. I'm two years ahead of schedule and I told my people I ahead of schedule and I told my people I ahead of schedule and I told my people, I told my people don't say that because it. Told my people don't say that because it told my people don't say that because it doesn't sound right, it sounds too much doesn't sound right.
It sounds too much doesn't sound right. It sounds too much right. Does that make sense, right? Does that make sense, right? Does that make sense? I say, say we're a year ahead of schedule, I say, say we're a year ahead of schedule. I say say we're a year ahead of schedule. It's crazy. We're two years ahead of.
It's crazy. We're two years ahead of it's crazy. We're two years ahead of schedule, schedule schedule. We don't have to have it open for two. We don't have to have it open for two. We don't have to have it open for two years and we're going to be opening like years and we're going to be opening like years and we're going to be opening like in September.
We'll have a ribbon-cutting in September. We'll have a ribbon-cutting in September. We'll have a ribbon-cutting, I want to delay it a little bit toward - I want to delay it a little bit toward - I want to delay it a little bit toward the election. You understand I could - the election, you understand I could the election, you understand I could actually do it in September early, I actually do it in September early.
I actually do it in September early. I don't want to happen, you know, because don't want to happen. You know, because don't want to happen, you know, because sometimes you people only have a - sometimes you people only have a - sometimes you people only have a two-week span. We remember for two weeks two-week span.
We remember for two weeks two-week span. We remember for two weeks. It's no good. So I think I'll open in, it's no good. So I think I'll open in. It's no good. So I think I'll open in September, but I'll have the grand September, but I'll have the grand September, but I'll have the grand opening like how about around October opening, like how about around October opening, like how about around October 29th or something like that, right?
29th? Or something like that, right? 29th or something like that, right? But it's true, I'm close to 2 years ahead, but it's true, I'm close to 2 years ahead. But it's true, I'm close to 2 years ahead of schedule. And I told my people, I said of schedule and I told my people I said of schedule. And I told my people I said, don't say 2 years because they came out, don't say 2 years because they came out, don't say 2 years because they came out.
And they said we're two years at it. I - and they said we're two years at it. I - and they said we're two years at it. I said it's not believable, it's true said it's not believable. It's true said it's not believable, it's true I said say 1 year sounds better, crazy I said say 1 year sounds better, crazy I said say 1 year sounds better, crazy right, right, right.
Am I right about that or not sound 2, am I right about that? Or not sound 2, am I right about that or not sound 2 years? It sounds like too much. How can years - it sounds like too much. How can years, it sounds like too much. How can you be 2 years? I'm 2 years, but I'm gonna, you be 2 years, I'm 2 years, but I'm gonna, you be 2 years, I'm 2 years.
But I'm gonna say 1 year because I think I'm covered, say, 1 year because I think I'm covered, say, 1 year. Because I think I'm covered that way, right, but I built a great that way, right. But I built a great that way right. But I built a great building, I'm under budget and ahead of building. I'm under budget and ahead of building.
I'm under budget and ahead of schedule, under budget and ahead of schedule, under budget and ahead of schedule, under budget and ahead of schedule terms. You never ever ever hear schedule terms. You never ever ever hear schedule terms. You never ever ever hear with our government. With our government, with our government, they built a road, it costs 10 times more.
They built a road, it costs 10 times more. They built a road, it costs 10 times more. They built a bridge. Look at San, they built a bridge. Look at San, they built a bridge, look at San Francisco with the bridge. They built the Francisco with the bridge. They built the Francisco with the bridge. They built the bridges at the who built the bridge bridges at the who built the bridge bridges at the who built the bridge China China built the bridge, right, San China, China built the bridge, right, San China, China built the bridge, right, San Francisco way way over-budget China, you Francisco way way over-budget China, you Francisco way way over-budget China.
You think China made a couple of bucks in think China made a couple of bucks in think China made a couple of bucks in the bridge. Oh, I don't think so nobody the bridge. Oh, I don't think so, nobody the bridge, oh, I don't think so. Nobody knows that stuff. That's what I'm best at, knows that stuff. That's what I'm best at, knows that stuff.
That's what I'm best at. Can you imagine? Can you imagine having - can you imagine - can you imagine having - can you imagine, can you imagine having somebody that really knows how to build somebody that really knows how to build somebody that really knows how to build and knows how to build under budget and knows how To build under budget and knows how to build under budget ahead of schedule, I'm really good at ahead of schedule.
I'm really good at ahead of schedule. I'm really good at this stuff, this stuff, this stuff and it can be done and we have and it can be done and we have and it can be done and we have everything cost too much. Everything cost too much, everything cost too much. Our military stuff, we're going to build our military stuff, we're going to build our military stuff.
We're going to build up our military, but we got to buy the up our military, but we got to buy the up our military, but we got to buy the best equipment at the lowest price. We best equipment at the lowest price. We best equipment at the lowest price. We don't do that. We don't do that. I mean, don't do that.
We don't do that. I mean, don't do that. We don't do that. I mean, there's so many things that we have to - there's so many things that we have to - there's so many things that we have to do. There's so many - I give you an example do. There's so many - I give you an example, do there's so many. I give you an example, I won the primers spending just about - I won the primers spending just about - I won the primers spending just about the least amount of money.
I mean, I can't - the least amount of money. I mean I can't - the least amount of money. I mean, I can't compare this a couple of guys that compare this a couple of guys that compare this a couple of guys that didn't even you know, they had no money, didn't even, you know, they had no money, didn't even, you know, they had no money.
They got zeros right there all at zero. I - they got zeros right there all at zero. I - they got zeros right there all at zero. I mean you had so many guys at zero. They mean you had so many guys at zero. They mean you had so many guys at zero, they stayed for the following week, zero, zero stayed for the following week, zero, zero stayed for the following week, zero, zero, zero.
I said how many times can they stay zero. I said how many times can they stay zero. I said how many times can they stay at zero. I spent less money than anybody at zero. I spent less money than anybody at zero. I spent less money than anybody else and I had by far the best results else and I had by far the best results else and I had by far the best results, massive victories, landslides, right and I massive victories landslides right and I massive victories landslides right.
And I think about our education system, we're think about our education system. We're think about our education system. We're last on the list in terms of countries last on the list in terms of countries last on the list in terms of countries were ranked number 28 to 30 and you have were ranked number 28 to 30 and you have were ranked number 28 to 30. And you have Norway, Denmark, Sweden, China, Japan, Norway, Denmark, Sweden, China, Japan, Norway, Denmark, Sweden, China, Japan, they're the top countries.
But we're - they're the top countries, but we're - they're the top countries, but we're ranked last or close to lives. And yet we ranked last or close to lives and yet we ranked last or close to lives and yet we spend the most. So just so you understand spend the most. So just so you understand spend the most.
So just so you understand with me with me, with me, I spent the least and I have the best, I spent the least and I have the best. I spent the least and I have the best result. And in education isn't that what result and in education isn't that what result and in education isn't that what we want, okay, isn't that what we want.
So we want, okay, isn't that what we want. So we want, okay, isn't that what we want? So an education, an education, an education, we spent the most, we spend the most, we spent the most, we spend the most, we spent the most, we spend the most money per pupil in the world by a factor money per pupil in the world by a factor Money per pupil in the world by a factor that there is no second place there is that there is no second place there is that there is no second place, there is no second place.
So this is what we want no second place. So this is what we want no second place. So this is what we want to do. We - first of all, we're getting rid to do we - first of all, we're getting rid to do we - first of all, we're getting rid of Common Core. We're going to bring of Common Core, we're going to bring of Common Core, we're going to bring education local, okay?
Obviously, it education local, okay? Obviously, it education local, okay? Obviously, it doesn't work. Obviously. Obviously, it doesn't work. Obviously. Obviously, it doesn't work obviously, obviously it doesn't. But I want to thank everybody doesn't, but I want to thank everybody doesn't, but I want to thank everybody.
This is a great honor. I'll be seeing you. This is a great honor. I'll be seeing you. This is a great honor. I'll be seeing you a lot. I'll be here so much, I'll be in a lot, I'll be here so much. I'll be in a lot. I'll be here so much. I'll be in Florida, I'll be with you so much over Florida, I'll be with you so much over Florida, I'll be with you.
So much over the next five months that you're going the next five months that you're going the next five months that you're going to say. Please keep him the hell out of to say. Please keep him the hell out of to say. Please keep him the hell out of Florida, what he's driving us crazy. He's Florida, what he's driving us crazy.
He's Florida, what he's driving us crazy. He's driving us crazy. But seriously, look, we driving us crazy. But seriously, look, we driving us crazy. But seriously, look, we have a big cast winning Florida is have a big cast, winning Florida is have a big cast, winning Florida is absolutely imperative, you know when absolutely imperative.
You know when absolutely imperative. You know when Florida, they say it's over, but I think Florida, they say it's over. But I think Florida, they say it's over. But I think I'm going to win a lot of states that I'm going to win a lot of states that I'm going to win a lot of states that nobody ever thought about because we're - nobody ever thought about because we're - nobody ever thought about because we're getting Numbers that are incredible in getting numbers that are incredible in getting numbers that are incredible in states that no Republican really would states that no Republican really would states that no Republican really would think about.
But we're going to win think about, but we're going to win think about, but we're going to win Florida, but most importantly if I win Florida, but most importantly if I win Florida, but most importantly if I win our country is going to start winning our country Is going to start winning our country is going to start winning again, okay?
We're going to start winning again, okay? We're going to start winning again, okay? We're going to start winning again. We're gonna win with every element. Again, we're gonna win with every element. Again, we're gonna win with every element we're going to win with our military. We - we're going to win with our military.
We - we're going to win with our military. We will defeat Isis by the way, very, very will defeat Isis by the way. Very, very will defeat Isis by the way, very, very quickly, very quickly. We have no choice quickly, very quickly. We have no choice quickly, very quickly. We have no choice chop off heads after though choice we're chop off heads after though choice we're chop off heads after though choice we're gonna win at the border, we're gonna win gonna win at the border.
We're gonna win gonna win at the border, we're gonna win with trade, we're gonna win with, with trade. We're gonna win with, with trade. We're gonna win with education, we're gonna win with education, we're gonna win with education. We're gonna win with everything. Oh, happy birthday. They're everything.
Oh, happy birthday. They're everything. Oh, happy birthday. They're singing. Happy birthday, singing, happy birthday, singing, happy birthday. Don't tell me. Happy. I don't want to hear. Don't tell me happy. I don't want to hear. Don't tell me happy, I don't want to hear about that birthday about that birthday, about that birthday.
Thank you, darling. That's so nice. I don't thank you, darling. That's so nice. I don't thank you, darling. That's so nice. I don't know if I wan na, I'm very torn on that know if I wan na, I'm very torn on that know if I wan na, I'm very torn on that birthday. I'm very torn. Do you understand birthday?
I'm very torn. Do you understand birthday? I'm very torn. Do you understand me? I'm very torn. I feel like I'm 35 me. I'm very torn. I feel like I'm 35 me. I'm very torn. I feel like I'm 35. That's the good news. Okay? I feel like that's the good news. Okay. I feel like that's the good news. Okay, I feel like I'm doing.
So folks I want to thank you. I'm doing so folks. I want to thank you. I'm doing so folks. I want to thank you and really we don't win anymore as a - and really we don't win anymore as a - and really we don't win anymore as a country, but we are going to start country, but we are going to start country, but we are going to Start winning so much, you're gonna love it, winning so much, you're gonna love it, winning so much, you're gonna love it.
You're going to be proud, you're going to - you're going to be proud, you're going to - you're going to be proud, you're going to be proud of your president, more be proud of your president, more be proud of your president. More importantly, you're going to be proud of importantly, you're going to be proud of importantly, you're going to be proud of your country.
Again, thank you very much. I your country again, thank you very much. I your country again, thank you very much. I love you Tampa. I love you, Florida. Thank love you, Tampa. I love you, Florida. Thank love you, Tampa. I love you, Florida. Thank you very much. Thank you. Thank you very you very much. Thank you.